District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Juvenile Curfew Sunset Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 4 of the Juvenile Curfew Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2025,
effective February 12, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-92; 73 DCR 22), is repealed.
Sec. 3. Section 3a of the Volunteer Services Temporary Amendment Act of 2025,
effective December 18, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-61; 72 DCR 13868), is repealed.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section

412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).